Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Nuclear Power Facilities

278.600.
Definitions for KRS 278.600 and 278.610.

As used in this section and KRS

278.610

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Certify” means to issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity under KRS

278.020

;

“High-level nuclear wastes” means the aqueous wastes resulting from the operation of the first cycle of the solvent extraction system or equivalent and the concentrated wastes of the subsequent extraction cycles or equivalent in a facility for reprocessing irradiated reactor fuel. High -level nuclear wastes shall include spent fuel assemblies prior to fuel reprocessing;

“Low-level nuclear waste” means items that have become contaminated with radioactive material or have become radioactive through exposure to neutron radiation;

“Mixed nuclear waste” means waste that is both radioactive and chemically hazardous;

“Nuclear power facility” or “nuclear facility” means a nuclear fission thermal power plant;

“Plan for storage of high-level nuclear waste” means a method for the storage of high-level nuclear waste in accordance with federal laws and regulation; and

“Storage” means the retention of high-level nuclear waste, spent nuclear fuel, or transuranic waste with the intent to recover the waste or fuel for subsequent use, processing, or disposal.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017).
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 118, sec. 5 provided that amendments made to this statute and
KRS

278.610

in Sections 1 and 2 of that Act shall be cited as the Robert J. Leeper Act.

(6/29/2017). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has changed the internal numbering of this statute to place the definitions in alphabetical order. No words were changed in this process.

278.605.
Construction prohibited until means for disposal of high-level nuclear waste approved by United States government — Exceptions for nuclear-based
technologies. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 15, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2012, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2017 ch. 118, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

278.610.
Requirements for certification of nuclear power facility.

The Public Service Commission may certify a nuclear power facility if it finds that the facility and plan for storage of the facility’s high-level nuclear waste have been approved by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

The commission shall have the authority to hire a consultant to perform duties relating to this section. Any expenses or fees incurred by the commission in hiring a consultant shall be borne by the applicant.

The construction of low-level nuclear waste disposal sites in the Commonwealth shall be prohibited, except as provided in KRS

211.852

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 15, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2017 ch. 118, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017).
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 118, sec. 5 provided that amendments made to this statute and
KRS

278.600

in Sections 1 and 2 of that Act shall be cited as the Robert J. Leeper Act.